Hawaii statutes.
PART VII.
RECORDS OF ACKNOWLEDGMENTS

Note

Sections 502-71 to 502-74 designated as Part VII and part
heading amended by L 2009, c 102, §2(8).

§502-71 Record of acknowledgments to be
kept. All judges and other officers authorized by law to take acknowledgments
to instruments, besides the certificate of acknowledgment indorsed upon the
instrument, shall keep a record of every acknowledgment in a book of records.
Each record shall set forth at least the date of acknowledgment, the parties to
the instrument, the persons acknowledging, the date, and some memorandum as to
the nature of the instrument acknowledged. [L 1888, c 18, §1; RL 1925, §3164;
RL 1935, §5150; RL 1945, §12750; RL 1955, §343-43; HRS §502-71]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next